Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6012
Risk-based capital plan, defined.

Risk-based capital plan means a comprehensive financial plan containing the elements specified in subsection (2) of section 44-6016. If the director rejects a plan and it is revised by the insurer or health organization, with or without the director's recommendation, the plan shall be called the revised risk-based capital plan.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 24;

Laws 1999, LB 258, § 17.